test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-1а-Impf-читать_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - читать : # Verb - full paradigm
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Inf: читать
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+Msc+Sg: читал
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+Neu+Sg: читало
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+Fem+Sg: читала
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+MFN+Pl: читали

    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg1: читаю
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg2: читаешь
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg3: читает
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl1: читаем
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl2: читаете
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl3: читают
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Imp+Sg2: читай
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Imp+Pl2: читайте
    
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Inf+Pass: читаться
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+Msc+Sg+Pass: читался
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+Neu+Sg+Pass: читалось
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+Fem+Sg+Pass: читалась
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+MFN+Pl+Pass: читались

    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg1+Pass+Fac: читаюсь
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg2+Pass+Fac: читаешься
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg3+Pass: читается
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl1+Pass+Fac: читаемся
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl2+Pass+Fac: читаетесь
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl3+Pass: читаются

    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Adv: читая
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: читав
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: читавши
    
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Inf: читать
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Pst+Msc+Sg: читал
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Pst+Neu+Sg: читало
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Pst+Fem+Sg: читала
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Pst+MFN+Pl: читали

    читать+V+Impf+IV+Prs+Sg1: читаю
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Prs+Sg2: читаешь
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Prs+Sg3: читает
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Prs+Pl1: читаем
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Prs+Pl2: читаете
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Prs+Pl3: читают
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Imp+Sg2: читай
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Imp+Pl2: читайте
    
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Adv: читая
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: читав
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: читавши
    
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: читающий
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: читающий
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: читающего
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen: читающего
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc: читающем
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat: читающему
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins: читающим
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom: читающее
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc: читающее
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen: читающего
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc: читающем
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat: читающему
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins: читающим
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom: читающая
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc: читающую
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen: читающей
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc: читающей
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat: читающей
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins: читающей
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom: читающие
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc: читающие
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc: читающих
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen: читающих
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc: читающих
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat: читающим
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins: читающими

    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: читающий
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: читающий
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: читающего
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen: читающего
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc: читающем
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat: читающему
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins: читающим
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom: читающее
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc: читающее
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen: читающего
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc: читающем
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat: читающему
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins: читающим
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom: читающая
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc: читающую
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen: читающей
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc: читающей
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat: читающей
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins: читающей
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom: читающие
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc: читающие
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc: читающих
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen: читающих
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc: читающих
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat: читающим
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins: читающими

    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: читаемый
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: читаемый
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: читаемого
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen: читаемого
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc: читаемом
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat: читаемому
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins: читаемым
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom: читаемое
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc: читаемое
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen: читаемого
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc: читаемом
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat: читаемому
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins: читаемым
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom: читаемая
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc: читаемую
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen: читаемой
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc: читаемой
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat: читаемой
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins: читаемой
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom: читаемые
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc: читаемые
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc: читаемых
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen: читаемых
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc: читаемых
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat: читаемым
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins: читаемыми
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+Sg+Pred: читаем
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Neu+Sg+Pred: читаемо
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Fem+Sg+Pred: читаема
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+MFN+Pl+Pred: читаемы

    
